Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-284
Case record; contents.

The record in a case under the Student Discipline Act shall consist of the charge, the notice, the evidence presented, the hearing examiner's findings and recommendations, and the action of the superintendent. With respect to any appeal to a court or any subsequent appeal, the record shall consist, in addition, of any additional evidence taken and any additional action taken in the case.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 28;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 34;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,197;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 88.